Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-571
Sections, how construed.

Sections 46-501 to 46-573, being necessary to secure and preserve the public health, safety, convenience and welfare, and for the security of public and private property, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes of sections 46-501 to 46-573.

Laws 1947, c. 173, § 37, p. 557.

This section provides a construction clause. Nebraska Mid-State Reclamation District v. Hall County, 152 Neb. 410, 41 N.W.2d 397 (1950).